trunk/incubator/da.olddic.dix
    <pardef n="øj/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="synops/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="salut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="risi/ko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciene</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koen</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koerne</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koer</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/atter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atteren</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atter</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtrene</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtre</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drage__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eng/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tog__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bid__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="afpresningsforsøg"><i>afpresningsforsøg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="åløb"><i>åløb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anskrig"><i>anskrig</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ark"><i>ark</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="åsyn"><i>åsyn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bagland"><i>bagland</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedriftværn"><i>bedriftværn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilag"><i>bilag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blålys"><i>blålys</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogskab"><i>bogskab</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøsseløb"><i>bøsseløb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brøl"><i>brøl</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="busk"><i>busk</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comeback"><i>comeback</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="datablad"><i>datablad</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diskoskast"><i>diskoskast</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drev"><i>drev</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyreliv"><i>dyreliv</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eksportlån"><i>eksportlån</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enkeltopslag"><i>enkeltopslag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fælleskort"><i>fælleskort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="favn"><i>favn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filtersalt"><i>filtersalt</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjæl"><i>fjæl</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fløj"><i>fløj</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="folkesagn"><i>folkesagn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forhåndstilsagn"><i>forhåndstilsagn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsøgsdyr"><i>forsøgsdyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frimærkealbum"><i>frimærkealbum</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gal"><i>gal</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gevind"><i>gevind</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gryn"><i>gryn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="håndslag"><i>håndslag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjemland"><i>hjemland</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hundyr"><i>hundyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indfald"><i>indfald</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jerngreb"><i>jerngreb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalveskind"><i>kalveskind</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klyngehus"><i>klyngehus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kollektivhus"><i>kollektivhus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krigsskib"><i>krigsskib</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lærerkorps"><i>lærerkorps</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="levnedsløb"><i>levnedsløb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luftangreb"><i>luftangreb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marathonløb"><i>marathonløb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modangreb"><i>modangreb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="narkovrag"><i>narkovrag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="offentlighedskrav"><i>offentlighedskrav</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="operationsudstyr"><i>operationsudstyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ordforråd"><i>ordforråd</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parketgulv"><i>parketgulv</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="point"><i>point</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="råbåndsknob"><i>råbåndsknob</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="redningskorps"><i>redningskorps</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="revelsben"><i>revelsben</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rovdyr"><i>rovdyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sælgerpantebrev"><i>sælgerpantebrev</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samvittighedsspørgsmål"><i>samvittighedsspørgsmål</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senatsudvalg"><i>senatsudvalg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skarn"><i>skarn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skravl"><i>skravl</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slutningsord"><i>slutningsord</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solskinstag"><i>solskinstag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprøjtehus"><i>sprøjtehus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stinkdyr"><i>stinkdyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styrkemål"><i>styrkemål</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taktslag"><i>taktslag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tillidshverv"><i>tillidshverv</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trældomsåg"><i>trældomsåg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udbetalingskort"><i>udbetalingskort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undulatfrø"><i>undulatfrø</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vejskilt"><i>vejskilt</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
